Vermont, session 2025-2026, H609.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 201 is amended to read:
§ 201. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(7) “Thermal energy exchange” means piped noncombustible fluids
used for transferring heat into and out of buildings for the purpose of avoiding,
eliminating, reducing any existing or new on-site greenhouse gas emissions of
VT LEG #386309 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.609
2026 Page 2 of 6
all types of heating and cooling processes, including comfort heating and
cooling, domestic hot water, and refrigeration.
(8) “Thermal energy exchange network” means all real estate, fixtures,
and personal property operated, owned, used, or to be used for or in connection
with or to facilitate distribution infrastructure project that supplies thermal
energy to more than one household, dwelling unit, or network group of
buildings that are not commonly owned. This definition does not include a
mutual benefit enterprise, cooperative or common interest community that is
owned by the persons it serves and that provides thermal energy exchange
services only to its members, a landlord providing thermal energy exchange
services only to its tenants where the service is included in the lease
agreement, or any entity that provides thermal energy exchange services only
to itself.
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 203 is amended to read:
§ 203. JURISDICTION OF CERTAIN PUBLIC UTILITIES
The Public Utility Commission and the Department of Public Service shall
have jurisdiction over the following described companies within the State, their
directors, receivers, trustees, lessees, or other persons or companies owning or
operating the companies and of all plants, lines, exchanges, and equipment of
the companies used in or about the business carried on by them in this State as
covered and included in this chapter. This jurisdiction shall be exercised by
VT LEG #386309 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.609
2026 Page 3 of 6
the Commission and the Department so far as may be necessary to enable them
to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred upon them by law.
The Commission and the Department may, when they deem the public good
requires, examine the plants, equipment, lines, exchanges, stations, and
property of the companies subject to their jurisdiction under this chapter.
* * *
(7) A person or company, other than a municipality or entity otherwise
exempted under section 231 of this title, that owns or operates a thermal
energy exchange network as defined in section 201 of this title.
(8) Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) and (2) of this section, the
Commission and Department shall not have jurisdiction over persons otherwise
not regulated by the Commission that are engaged in the siting, construction,
ownership, operation, or control of a facility that sells or supplies electricity to
the public exclusively for charging a plug-in electric vehicle, as defined in
23 V.S.A. § 4(85). These persons may charge by the kWh for owned or
operated electric vehicle supply equipment, as defined in section 201 of this
title, but shall not be treated as an electric distribution utility just because
electric vehicle supply equipment charges by the kWh.
(8)(9) For purposes of this section, “storage” has the same meaning as
“energy storage facility” as defined in section 201 of this title.
VT LEG #386309 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.609
2026 Page 4 of 6
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 231 is amended to read:
§ 231. CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC GOOD; ABANDONMENT OF
SERVICE; HEARING
* * *
(d) Any person or company may petition for a certificate of public good
pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to own or operate a thermal energy
exchange network; provided, however, that any utility with existing authority
established before July 1, 2026, to provide retail electric or natural gas service
shall also be authorized to own or operate a thermal energy exchange network
subject to the provisions of this title and rules issued by the Commission.
Notwithstanding any other State law to the contrary, a municipality or fire
district established for the purpose of operating a thermal energy exchange
network utility shall have the authority to construct, operate, set rates for,
finance, and use eminent domain for a thermal energy exchange network utility
without a certificate of public good or approval by the Commission. Nothing
in this section shall alter the requirements of 10 V.S.A. chapter 151, including
for district energy projects such as those described in subdivision 209(e)(1) of
this title.
VT LEG #386309 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.609
2026 Page 5 of 6
Sec. 4. 20 V.S.A. § 2601 is amended to read:
§ 2601. GENERALLY
A fire district may vote to adopt the town manager system in compliance
with 24 V.S.A. chapter 37. It may vote a tax upon the taxable estate for the
protection of property in the district from damage by fire; for the acquisition,
construction, and maintenance of sewers and sewage treatment works;
sidewalks; public parks; water works, water companies, and equipment and
real estate used in connection therewith, including reservoirs and dams; for
lighting; for the construction, operation, and maintenance of thermal energy
exchange networks; and for other lawful purposes. The prudential committee
and collector shall have the same power in assessing, levying, and collecting
the tax, as town officers have in assessing and collecting town taxes, including
the collection of interest on overdue taxes. The prudential committee may
expend such sums for acquiring, constructing, and maintaining sewers and
sewage treatment works; sidewalks; public parks; water works, water
companies,; thermal energy exchange networks; and all equipment and real
estate used in connection therewith, including reservoirs and dams; and for
lighting purposes as the fire district may vote. The committee may use and
occupy such portions of the highways within the district as may be necessary
for constructing and maintaining sewers and sewage treatment works;
VT LEG #386309 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.609
2026 Page 6 of 6
sidewalks; public parks; water works and mains, thermal energy exchange
networks; and for lighting purposes.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386309 v.1